Utah statutes.
54-13-1.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter, "intrastate pipeline transportation" and "pipeline facilities" have the definitions set forth in the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968, 49 U.S.C.  Section 60101.

